Washington statutes.
RCW 25.12.010

Limited partnership may be formed.

Limited partnerships for the transaction of mercantile, mechanical, or manufacturing business may be formed within this state, by two or more persons, upon the terms and subject to the conditions contained in this chapter.

[ 1955 c 15 s 25.12.010. Prior: 1869 p 380 s 1; RRS s 9966.]